Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1092.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. CW5 John Michael Travers Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) John Michael Travers was born in Harrisburg on February 23, 1948.(2) Chief Warrant Officer 5 Travers graduated from Bishop McDevitt High School in 1966, where he was a member of the championship basketball teams in 1965 and 1966.(3) In 1969, CW5 Travers enlisted in the United States Army, and after basic training, he completed Army Warrant Officer Flight School, graduating in June 1970.(4) CW5 Travers volunteered to become a combat medical evacuation pilot, referred to as a DUSTOFF, and in September 12345678910111213141516171819 1970, he was assigned to the 82nd Medical Detachment, Helicopter Ambulance, 68th Medical Group.(5) CW5 Travers flew 955 combat medical evacuation missions throughout the Mekong Delta Region, evacuating 2,405 wounded, between October 1970 and November 1971.(6) CW5 Travers was shot down twice on rescue missions.(7) CW5 Travers received the following commendations: Legion of Merit, Distinguished Flying Cross, Bronze Star with Valor Device, Meritorious Service Medal, 31 Air Medals, Army Commendation Medal, with 3 Oak Leaf Clusters, Army Good Conduct Medal, Army Reserve Component Achievement Medal with 6 Oak Leaf Clusters, National Defense Service Medal with Oak Leaf Cluster, Vietnam Service Medal with Bronze Star, Armed Forces Reserve Medal with 20-year Device, Army Service Ribbon, Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation with Palm, Republic of Vietnam Gallantry Cross Unit Citation with Silver Star and Republic of Vietnam Service Medal.(8) After returning from Vietnam in 1971, CW5 Travers continued his service to the United States by joining the Pennsylvania Army National Guard. During Hurricane Agnes in 1972, he flew rescue missions in adverse weather conditions, over and under power lines and bridges, with his crew, to save 53 fellow Pennsylvanians, most trapped on rooftops. CW5 Travers received the Pennsylvania Meritorious Service Medal.(9) CW5 Travers flew numerous missions for the Pennsylvania National Guard, including during Tropical Storm Eloise in 1975 and the Truckers' Strike in 1977. He also served as an Instructor Pilot and Aviation Safety Officer.(10) At the Eastern Army Aviation Training Site, at Fort Indiantown Gap, CW5 Travers served as Standardization 20250SB1092PN1314 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Instructor Pilot and Instrument Examiner.(11) CW5 Travers was a leader in initiating the UH-60 Black Hawk training program at the Eastern Army Aviation Training Site.(12) CW5 Travers was a Maintenance Test Pilot and a Maintenance Test Pilot Examiner, during his 28 years of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard. Contemporaries all agree that he was a man of great integrity and extreme devotion to duty and had a positive impact on everyone he worked with and everyone he trained, National Guard, Reserve, Active Duty and International air crews.(13) On November 2, 2007, CW5 Travers was awarded The Bronze Medallion of the Legion of Honor from the Chapel of The Four Chaplains, "to recognize those who selflessly serve their community and nation. It is important that we recognize those who have done so much for others. His military service and continuing work with veterans' organizations is exactly what this organization tries to recognize. His devotion to his country, community and fellow veterans is an example we all should live by."(14) CW5 Travers worked to establish the Vietnam Veterans of America, Michael J. Novosel, MOH, Chapter 542, in Harrisburg, and served as president.(15) CW5 Travers spearheaded the crusade for the Combat Medic Badge for Vietnam DUSTOFF air medics, including testimony at United States Senate Subcommittee hearings in Washington, DC.(16) For the past 20 years, CW5 Travers courageously battled several Vietnam Agent Orange diseases.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 20250SB1092PN1314 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 22595, located on that portion of U.S. Route 22 in East Hanover Township, Lebanon County, over Pennsylvania Route 934 is designated the CW5 John Michael Travers Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1092PN1314 - 4 - 12345678